Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1393.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 following:* * *(8.2) Article XVII-M.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MPAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE TAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article relates to paid family and medical leave tax credits.Section 1702-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Federal family and medical leave tax credit." The tax credit authorized under 26 U.S.C. § 45S (relating to employer credit for paid family and medical leave).Section 1703-M. Family and Medical Leave Tax Credit Program.(a) Establishment.--The Family and Medical Leave Tax Credit Program is established to supplement, not supplant, existing Federal tax incentives for providing paid family and medical leave to employees.(b) Information.--To qualify for a tax credit under this article, a business firm must submit information to the department that enables the department to confirm the amount of 20250HB1393PN1588 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Federal family and medical leave tax credit that the business firm has received for providing paid family and medical leave to employees in this Commonwealth.(c) Application.--The following apply to an application for a tax credit under this article that is submitted to the department by a business firm:(1) The application must account for the wages paid to employees for which the business firm claimed the Federal family and medical leave tax credit.(2) The application must be on a form provided by the department.(3) The department shall consult with the United States Internal Revenue Service as necessary to determine that the business firm provides paid family and medical leave for employees.(4) The department shall review and approve or disapprove the application.(d) Notification.--The department shall notify the business firm that the business firm meets the requirements under this article for that fiscal year no later than 60 days after the business firm has submitted the application required under this section.Section 1704-M. Availability of tax credits.(a) Application and receipt.--A business firm may:(1) Apply to the department for a tax credit in accordance with section 1705-M.(2) Receive a tax credit under this article equal to the amount of the Federal family and medical leave tax credit received for the most recently completed tax year.(b) Limitations.--Tax credits under this section shall be 20250HB1393PN1588 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 made available by the department on a first-come, first-served basis within the limitation established under section 1706-M(a).Section 1705-M. Grant of tax credits.(a) Tax credit certificate.--In accordance with section 1706-M(a), the department shall grant a tax credit certificate to which the following apply:(1) The certificate may be used against a tax liability owed to the Commonwealth by a business firm that provides proof of receipt of the Federal family and medical leave tax credit in the taxable year in which the paid family and medical leave was granted to an employee in this Commonwealth.(2) The business firm may apply the credit against any tax due under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III.(b) Limitation.--The tax credit shall not exceed 100% of the total amount of the Federal family and medical leave tax credit received by a business firm for granting paid family and medical leave to an employee in this Commonwealth for the taxable year in which the paid family and medical leave was granted.Section 1706-M. Amount of tax credits.(a) Aggregate amount.--The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved under this article may not exceed $100,000,000 in a fiscal year.(b) Tax liability.--A tax credit granted for any one taxable year may not exceed the tax liability of a business firm.(c) Use.--A tax credit not used in the taxable year the paid family and medical leave was granted to an employee in this Commonwealth may not be carried forward or carried back and is not refundable or transferable.20250HB1393PN1588 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1707-M. Guidelines.The department, in conjunction with the Department of Revenue, may establish guidelines as necessary to implement this article.Section 1708-M. Reporting.In addition to the information required by section 1707-A.1, each report on the tax credit authorized under this article shall include:(1) The number of tax credit applications denied solely as the result of the limitation under section 1706-M(a).(2) The aggregate amount of tax credits not granted solely as the result of the limitation in section 1706-M(a).(3) The average amount of each tax credit not granted for the applications denied solely as the result of the limitation in section 1706-M(a).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1393PN1588 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516